Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 26 Farm Mutual Property Insurers

Cross references. —

For provision as to Insurance Code being inapplicable to farm mutual property insurers, see §

26-1-104

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 74 to 80.

What constitutes “farm use” within provisions of insurance policy, 10 ALR2d 674.

What constitutes “farm product” or “farm produce” within coverage of fire insurance policy, 71 ALR2d 1266.

Determination of amount payable on loss to growing crop under policy insuring against loss or injury, 20 ALR3d 924.

Farm owners' liability insurance risks and coverage, 93 ALR3d 472.

§ 26-26-101.
Scope and applicability of chapter; provisions exclusive. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 524; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-524; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-102.
Insuring powers generally; limitations. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 525, 526; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-524, 26.1-525; W.S. 1977, §§

26-31-102

,

26-31-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 66, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-103.
Business on assessment plan required. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 527; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-527; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-104.
Incorporation generally. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 528; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-528; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-105.
Articles of incorporation; generally. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 529; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-529; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-106.
Articles of incorporation; filing fee. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 530; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-530; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2000, ch. 30, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-107.
Articles of incorporation; amendment. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 531; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-531; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-108

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2000, ch. 30, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-108.
Corporate powers generally. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 532; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-532; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-109

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-109.
Exemption from fees and taxes; exception. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 533; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-533; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-110

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-110.
Certificate of authority required; issuance; expiration; suspension or revocation. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 534; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-534; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-111

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2000, ch. 30, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-111.
Bylaws; generally. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 535, 537; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-535, 26.1-537; W.S. 1977, §§

26-31-112

,

26-31-114

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-112.
Bylaws; contents. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 536; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-536; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-113

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-113.
Membership; generally. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 538; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-538; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-115

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-114.
Membership; withdrawal of members; cancellation of policies. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 539; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-539; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-116

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-115.
Board of directors. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 540; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-540; W.S. 1977, §

26-31-117

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-116.
Officers; enumerated; election; terms of office. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 541; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-541; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-118; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-117.
Officers; bonds. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 542; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-542; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-119; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-118.
Records and accounts. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 543; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-543; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-120; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-119.
Profits or dividends prohibited; reserves. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 544; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-544; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-121; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-120.
Annual statement; required; preparation; filing; fee. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 545; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-545; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-122; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-121.
Annual statement; presentation at annual meeting. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 546; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-546; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-123; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-122.
Application for insurance. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 547; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-547; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-124; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-123.
Approval of forms by commissioner. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 548; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-548; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-125; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-124.
Rates. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 549; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-549; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-126; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-125.
Claims; written notice required; adjustment. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 550; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-550; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-127; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-126.
Claims; arbitration of dispute by committee of reference. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 551; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-551; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-128; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-127.
Assessment of insured property; when to be made. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 552; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-552; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-129; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-128.
Assessment of insured property; notice; time of payment; suit to collect assessment. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 553, 554; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-553, 26.1-554; W.S. 1977, §§ 26-31-130, 26-31-131; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-129.
Suit to collect insured loss. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 555; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-555; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-132; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-130.
Liability of officers and directors. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 556; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-556; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-133; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

§ 26-26-131.
Other provisions applicable. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 557; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-557; W.S. 1977, § 26-31-134; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; repealed by 2018 ch. 21, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.